it: Compatibile chitarra classica, lunghezza della scala: Scala extra lunga; Scala lunga; Scala normale/standard; Scala corta; Altra
zh-TW: 相容的古典吉他弦長: 超長弦長; 長弦長; 一般/標準弦長; 短弦長; 其他
es: Longitud de escala compatible de las cuerdas para guitarra clásica: Escala extralarga; Escala larga; Escala normal/estándar; Escala corta; Otra
en: Compatible classical guitar string scale length: Extra-long scale; Long scale; Normal/standard scale; Short scale; Other
pt-PT: Comprimento de escala da corda de guitarra clássica compatível: Escala extralonga; Escala longa; Escala normal/padrão; Escala curta; Outra
pt-BR: Comprimento da escala das cordas de violão clássico: Escala extralonga; Escala longa; Escala normal/padrão; Escala curta; Outro
nb: Kompatibel styrkeskalalengde for klassisk gitar: Ekstra lang mensur; Lang mensur; Normal/standard mensur; Kort mensur; Annet
sv: Kompatibel skallängd för klassisk gitarrsträng: Extra lång mensur; Lång mensur; Normal/standardmensur; Kort mensur; Annat
hu: Kompatibilis klasszikus gitárhúr skálák hosszával: Extra hosszú skála; Hosszú skála; Normál/standard skála; Rövid skála; Egyéb
th: ความยาวสเกลสายกีตาร์คลาสสิกที่เหมาะสม: สเกลยาวพิเศษ; สเกลยาว; สเกลปกติ/มาตรฐาน; สเกลสั้น; อื่นๆ
vi: Chiều dài thang âm dây đàn guitar cổ điển tương thích: Thước âm cực dài; Thước âm dài; Thước âm thông thường/tiêu chuẩn; Thước âm ngắn; Khác
nl: Compatibele klassieke gitaar mensuurlengte: Extra lange mensuur; Lange mensuur; Normale/standaard mensuur; Korte mensuur; Overig
ko: 호환 클래식 기타 줄 스케일 길이: 엑스트라 롱 스케일; 롱 스케일; 일반/표준 스케일; 숏 스케일; 기타
lt-LT: Suderinamas klasikinės gitaros stygų menzūros ilgis: Itin ilga menzūra; Ilga menzūra; Normali / standartinė menzūra; Trumpa menzūra; Kita
el: Συμβατό μήκος κλίμακας χορδών κλασικής κιθάρας: Πολύ μεγάλη κλίμακα; Μεγάλη κλίμακα; Κανονική/τυπική κλίμακα; Μικρή κλίμακα; Άλλο
ro-RO: Lungimea de scală corzi cu care este compatibilă chitara clasica: Scală extra-lungă; Scală lungă; Scală normală/standard; Scală scurtă; Altele
sl-SI: Združljiva dolžina lestvice za strune za klasično kitaro: Zelo dolga menzura; Dolga menzura; Normalna/standardna menzura; Kratka menzura; Drugo
fr: Longueur de diapason des cordes de guitare classique compatible: Diapason très long; Diapason long; Diapason normal / standard; Diapason court; Autre
ja: 互換性のあるクラシックギターストリングスケール長さ: エクストラロングスケール; ロングスケール; ノーマル / スタンダードスケール; ショートスケール; その他
zh-CN: 适配古典吉他有效弦长: 超长有效弦长; 长有效弦长; 常规/标准有效弦长; 短有效弦长; 其他
bg-BG: Съвместима мензура на струни за класическа китара: Екстра дълга мензура; Дълга мензура; Нормална/стандартна мензура; Къса мензура; Друго
hr-HR: Kompatibilna duljina skale niz za klasičnu gitaru: Izuzetno duga skala; Duga skala; Normalna / standardna skala; Kratka skala; Ostalo
cs: Kompatibilní délka menzury strun klasické kytary: Extra dlouhá menzura; Dlouhá menzura; Normální/standardní menzura; Krátká menzura; Jiné
tr: Uyumlu klasik gitar tel skala uzunluğu: Ekstra uzun ölçek; Uzun ölçek; Normal/standart ölçek; Kısa ölçek; Diğer
de: Kompatible Mensur für klassische Gitarrensaiten: Extra lange Mensur; Lange Mensur; Normale/Standard-Mensur; Kurze Mensur; Sonstige
da: Kompatibel strengemensur til klassisk guitar: Ekstra lang skala; Lang skala; Normal/standardskala; Kort skala; Andet
pl: Kompatybilna długość menzury strun do gitary klasycznej: Bardzo długa menzura; Długa menzura; Normalna/standardowa menzura; Krótka menzura; Inne
sk-SK: Kompatibilná dĺžka menzúry strún pre klasickú gitaru: Extra dlhá menzúra; Dlhá menzúra; Normálna/štandardná menzúra; Krátka menzúra; Iné
fi: Yhteensopiva klassinen kitaran mensuuripituus: Erittäin pitkä skaala; Pitkä skaala; Normaali/vakioskaala; Lyhyt skaala; Muu
ru: Совместимая мензура струн для классической гитары: Очень длинная мензура; Длинная мензура; Нормальная/стандартная мензура; Короткая мензура; Другое